Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5212
Rental agreement; requirements; appeal.

In evaluating a rental agreement between an owner of agricultural assets and a qualified beginning farmer or livestock producer, the board shall not approve and certify credit for an owner of agricultural assets who has, with fault, terminated a prior board approved and certified rental agreement with a qualified beginning farmer or livestock producer or if the agricultural assets have previously been approved in a qualifying rental agreement. Any person aggrieved by a decision of the board may appeal the decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB560, § 6.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.